Arkansas, session 2025, HB1263.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 5, Chapter 54, Subchapter 1, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
5-54-123. Unlawful removal or failure to charge an electronic
monitoring device.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Electronic monitoring device" means an electronic device
approved by the Board of Corrections that meets the minimum Federal
Communications Commission regulations and requirements and that utilizes
available technology that is able to track a person's location and monitor
his or her location; and
(2) "Pending charge” means a charge that results from an arrest
or issuance of a citation or criminal summons, or after the filing of an
information or indictment, and that has not been resolved by acquittal,
conviction, dismissal, or nolle prosequi.
(b) A person commits unlawful removal or failure to charge an
electronic monitoring device if, being ordered to wear an electronic
*CEB052*
01/27/2025 2:57:08 PM CEB052

HB1263
monitoring device as a condition of probation, parole, post-release
supervision, or release on a pending charge or disposition of a charge:
(1) The person knowingly removes the electronic monitoring
device from his or her body; or
(2) The person knowingly fails to properly charge the electronic
monitoring device and the failure to properly charge the electronic
monitoring device prevents the electronic monitoring device from tracking or
monitoring the person's location.
(c) It is a defense to prosecution under this section that the:
(1) Removal of the electronic monitoring device or failure to
charge the electronic monitoring device was due to an emergency condition or
unforeseen circumstance; and
(2) Defendant acted as a reasonable person in the defendant's
position would act.
(d) Unlawful removal or failure to charge an electronic monitoring
device is a Class A misdemeanor.
(e) Upon conviction for unlawful removal or failure to charge an
electronic monitoring device, a defendant shall be ordered to pay restitution
for the cost of repair or replacement of the electronic monitoring device if
the electronic monitoring device was damaged, lost, or destroyed.
















01/27/2025 2:57:08 PM CEB052